California statutes. Education Code
(b) The indirect costs charged by county offices of education and school districts that provide regional occupational centers and programs services on behalf of the county office of education or joint powers authority, when added together, may not exceed the indirect cost rate approved by the department for the county office of education or the school district, whichever is higher.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 108.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

52334.5.

(a) Within existing resources, the department shall conduct monitoring reviews of each regional occupational center or program at least once every four years for compliance with applicable state laws and regulations, to provide focused and targeted technical assistance and support, and to assist with the remediation of identified deficiencies.

(b) The department, in consultation with local regional occupational centers or programs, shall develop a monitoring instrument focused
 on all of the following:

(1) The regional occupational center or program administration and instructional programs.

(2) The alignment of curriculum with standards.

(3) The sequencing of courses in a pathway articulated with middle schools, campus-based secondary school courses, and postsecondary educational institutions.

(4) Teacher credentials.

(5) Counseling and guidance.

(6) Business and industry involvement.

(7) Local labor market review.

(8) Required actions of local governing boards.

(9) Other components determined by the Superintendent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 572, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52334.7.

(a) The Superintendent may certify, by name, any regional occupational center or program, county office of education, or adult education program established pursuant to Section 52501 that provides a program of training to prepare adult students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation, to legally authorize the center, program, or office to provide an educational program beyond secondary education, including an education program that leads to a degree or certificate, for purposes of the center, program, or office participating in any student financial assistance program authorized by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.).

(b) A regional
 occupational center or program, county office of education, or adult education program established pursuant to Section 52501 applying for certification pursuant to subdivision (a) shall comply with all of the following:

(1) It shall admit as regular students to its program of training only those students who meet one or more of the following requirements:

(A) Have a high school diploma.

(B) Have the recognized equivalent of a high school diploma.

(C) Are beyond the age of compulsory school attendance.

(2) It shall provide an eligible program of training, as defined in Section 668.8 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as this section reads on July 1, 2015, to prepare students
 for gainful employment in a recognized occupation.

(3) It shall be accredited or preaccredited.

(4) It shall have been in existence for at least two years as described in subsection (b) of Section 600.6 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as this section reads on July 1, 2015.

(5) It shall be an institution or site physically located in the state.

(6) It shall agree to submit any dispute involving the final denial, withdrawal, or termination of its accreditation to initial arbitration before initiating any other legal action.

(7) It shall satisfy all applicable eligibility requirements specified in federal rulemaking pursuant to Sections 600.6, 600.7, and 600.9 of Title 34 of
 the Code of Federal Regulations, as these sections read on July 1, 2015, other than the authorization provided for in subdivision (a).

(8) It shall apply in writing to the Superintendent, as an individual center, program, or office, to be considered for certification pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Any person may file a complaint under the Uniform Complaint Procedures, as set forth in Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, regarding an alleged violation by a local agency of federal or state law or regulations governing adult education programs established pursuant to Section 52501 or regional occupational centers and programs.

(d) The Superintendent shall adopt regulations that authorize any person to file a complaint under the Uniform Complaint Procedures, as set forth in Title 5 of the California Code of
 Regulations, regarding an alleged violation by a county office of education of federal or state law or regulations governing that county office’s participation in any student financial assistance program authorized by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.).

(e) The Superintendent may decertify, for purposes of participating in any student financial aid assistance program authorized by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.), a regional occupational center or program, county office of education, or adult education program established pursuant to Section 52501 previously certified in accordance with subdivision (a) if the Superintendent determines that the regional occupational center or program, county office of education, or adult education program established pursuant to Section 52501 is no longer in compliance with the requirements
 outlined in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 22, Sec. 2.   (SB 81)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Apportionment of Funds for Regional Occupational Centers [52335. - 52335.12.]

52335.

For purposes of this article, “ROC/P” means regional occupational center or program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 109.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

52335.12.

(a) As a condition of receiving state or federal funds, the regional occupational center or program shall report annually to the department the academic and workforce preparation progress of the secondary pupils enrolled in the center or program. Indicators to measure that progress shall include, but are not limited to, the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress, established pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640) of Chapter 5 of Part 33, and other indicators of academic and workforce preparation success, such as reduced dropout rates, workforce preparation, increased matriculation into postsecondary educational institutions, and other measures as determined by the department.

(b) This section shall become effective only when the longitudinal data on pupils enrolled in regional occupational centers and programs can be disaggregated from the California longitudinal pupil achievement data system database, established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 60900) of Part 33.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 641, Sec. 14.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.7. Career Preparatory Program [52336. - 52336.5.]

52336.

(a) Any business, trade or professional association, union, or state or local governmental agency operating within this state may establish and operate, under the auspices of the local school district, a career preparatory program within this state that meets the requirements of this article.

(b) As part of a career preparatory program, an entity establishing and operating the program shall develop and implement a course of instruction for all pupils enrolled in the program that satisfies the requirements of Section 51225.3 applicable to grades 11 and 12.

(c) Subject to the development of the course of instruction delineated in subdivision (b) and to continuing certification by the State Department of Education, an entity establishing and operating a career preparatory program may propose and implement a program that is designed to provide on-the-job training and instruction in specific career technical skills to prepare students for future employment.

(d) An entity establishing and operating a career preparatory program shall present pupils who have successfully completed all aspects of the program with a certificate of completion that shall supplement a high school diploma.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52336.1.

Any pupil who has successfully completed his or her education through grade 10, with the written consent of his or her parent or guardian, may choose to follow either a traditional college preparatory curriculum or a career preparatory program established pursuant to Section 52336.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1180, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

52336.3.

(a) The State Department of Education shall adopt rules and regulations by January 1, 1996, in relation to the following:

(1) An application process for entities that are seeking to establish and operate a career preparatory program pursuant to Section 52336 that includes, but is not limited to, the name of the entity, the organizational structure of the entity, its years of operation within the state, its financial stability, and the type of career preparatory program to be offered.

(2) An application process for pupils who are seeking to enroll in a career preparatory program established pursuant to Section 52336 that includes, but is not limited to, the age of the pupil, transcripts, or other official documents that show successful completion of his or her education through grade 10, and written consent for participation in the career preparatory program from the parent or guardian of the pupil.

(3) An initial and continuing certification process to ensure that the entity seeking to establish and operate a career preparatory program pursuant to Section 52336 develops and implements the course of instruction set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 52336.

(4) A process to evaluate and certify that pupils have successfully completed the course of instruction set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 52336. This process may include the successful completion of standardized achievement tests as developed by the State Department of Education.

(5) Any other necessary standards or policies to govern the administration of career preparatory programs established under this article.

(b) The rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be published for distribution as soon as practicable after adoption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1180, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

52336.5.

(a) A private entity establishing a career preparatory program pursuant to this article shall not be eligible for any moneys from the state or any school district.

(b) An entity establishing a career preparatory program pursuant to Section 52336 may contract for assistance in the development or administration of that program with one or more of the following:

(1) A community college district.

(2) A school district that operates an adult education program.

(3) A regional occupational center or program.

(4) Any other public career technical education program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. High School Career Technical Courses [52370. - 52377.]

52370.

The governing board of any high school district may provide for the maintenance on Saturday of special day and evening classes in career technical training authorized and provided for by any program of national defense of the federal government, or any agency thereof, acting through the State Department of Education.

No apportionments from state funds based upon average daily attendance in special day or evening classes, whether maintained on Saturday or other days, shall be made where the total cost of the classes is borne by the federal government, or any agency thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52371.

Pilot programs may be established by school districts to provide for the maintenance on Saturday of classes in career technical training, upon the approval of the Superintendent of Public Instruction. Career technical training may be a part of, but is not limited to, a program of national defense of the federal government, or any agency thereof.

No apportionments to districts from state funds based upon average daily attendance in these classes, whether maintained on Saturday or other days, shall be made where the total cost of the classes is borne by the federal government, or any agency thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52372.

The governing board of any high school district, subject to the provisions of this code relating to courses of study for high schools, the governing board of any joint powers regional occupational center or program, or the county superintendent of schools which conducts any county-operated regional occupational center or program, may establish and maintain, in connection with any high school or regional occupational center or program under its or his or her jurisdiction, cooperative career technical education programs or community classrooms as part of a career technical education course in accordance with rules and regulations prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52372.1.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall adopt rules and regulations for cooperative career technical education programs and community classrooms. The rules and regulations shall include, but need not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Selection and approval of work and training stations.

(2) Related classroom instruction.

(3) Supervision of students while in training.

(4) Joint venture training agreements and plans.

(5) Student teacher ratios.

(6) Paid and unpaid on-the-job experiences.

(7) Credit for participation in cooperative career technical education programs and community classrooms.

(b) As used in this section, “cooperative career technical education programs” includes cooperative agreements between schools and employers to provide students with paid on-the-job experiences, as well as career technical education instruction contributing to the student’s education and employability.

(c) As used in this section, “community classrooms” includes instructional methodologies which are part of a career technical education course, and which may utilize the facilities and equipment of a public agency or private business to provide students the opportunity to expand competencies developed in a career technical course in unpaid on-the-job experiences.

(d) Joint venture agreements shall be entered into between the director and the management of the community classroom site to ensure that students will be provided, through unpaid on-the-job experiences, the opportunity to expand the competencies developed in the classroom instruction portion of their training.

Each instructor, in cooperation with the business or agency in which the student will be placed, shall develop an individualized training plan for each pupil enrolled in a community classroom.

(e) All statutes and regulations applicable to minors in employment relationships apply to cooperative career technical education programs and to community classrooms.

(f) For purposes of this section, “public agency” means any public agency capable of providing unpaid on-the-job experience meeting all of the following requirements:

(1) The on-the-job experiences are in occupations for which there is a local job market.

(2) The on-the-job experiences are equivalent to those which could be received for each specific occupational area as if they were held at a private business site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52372.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, a “linked learning program” is a program that is all of the following:

(1) A multiyear, comprehensive high school program of integrated academic and technical study that is organized around a broad theme, interest area, or industry sector, including, but not necessarily limited to, the industry sectors identified in the model standards adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 51226.

(2) A program that ensures that all pupils have curriculum choices that will prepare them for career entry and a full range of postsecondary options, including two- and four-year college,
 apprenticeship, and formal employment training.

(3) A program that is comprised, at a minimum, of the following components:

(A) An integrated core curriculum that meets the eligibility requirements for admission to the University of California and the California State University and is delivered through project-based learning and other engaging instructional strategies that intentionally bring real-world context and relevance to the curriculum where broad themes, interest areas, and career technical education are emphasized.

(B) An integrated technical core of a sequence of at least four related courses, that may reflect career technical education standards-based courses, that provide pupils with career skills, that are aligned to and underscore academic principles, and to the extent possible fulfill the academic
 core requirements listed in subparagraph (A).

(C) A series of work-based learning opportunities that begin with mentoring and job shadowing and evolve into intensive internships, school-based enterprises, or virtual apprenticeships.

(D) Support services, including supplemental instruction in reading and mathematics, that help pupils master the advanced academic and technical content that is necessary for success in college and career.

(b) The Superintendent, in conjunction with the Office of the Secretary for Education, the California Community Colleges, the University of California, the California State University, the Employment Development Department, both houses of the California Legislature, teachers, chamber organizations, industry representatives, research centers, parents, school administrators,
 representatives of regional occupational centers and programs, community-based organizations, labor organizations, and others deemed appropriate by the Superintendent, shall develop a report that explores the feasibility of establishing and expanding additional linked learning programs in California, including the costs and merits associated with expansion of these programs. Linked learning programs created for high schools may include, but are not limited to, California partnership academies, regional occupational centers and programs, charter schools, academies, small learning communities, and other career-themed small schools.

(c) The report described in subdivision (b) shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify regulations, policies, and practices that need to be added, deleted, or amended in order to promote the development and expansion of linked learning programs.

(2) Set forth a reasonable timeline for the development and expansion of linked learning programs.

(3) Include at least all of the following components:

(A) Assessment of the current capacity of the department for the purpose of maximizing the development of these programs.

(B) Identifying the possible roles and responsibilities of other departments or agencies to assist in developing or expanding linked learning programs.

(C) An assessment of the appropriateness of school districts fulfilling the requirements set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 51228 by developing industry-focused linked learning programs, including those described in this section.

(D) Methods for developing and sharing models of integrated curriculum and instruction.

(E) Strategies for increasing the course options and instructional time for pupils in high school.

(F) Plans for increasing opportunities for high-quality learning based on real-world applications in industry and careers.

(G) Methods for improving alignment of curriculum between middle schools and high schools with career instruction, exploration, and counseling for middle school pupils.

(H) Methods for improving coordination and articulation between high schools and postsecondary institutions, including, but not limited to, California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University
 of California.

(I) Recommendations for increasing the supply of teachers who can teach effectively in a linked learning setting that aims to prepare pupils for a full range of postsecondary options. Necessary specialized skills include, but are not limited to, the abilities to design interdisciplinary projects and use project-based learning as an instructional strategy, work with other teachers in a team-teaching arrangement, develop curriculum that effectively integrates academic and technical content, design and utilize high-quality work-based learning to reinforce lessons in both academic and technical courses, and develop authentic pupil assessments.

(J) Recommendations for increasing the supply of schoolsite and district administrators who can effectively create and manage schools that are implementing one or more industry-focused linked learning programs. Necessary
 specialized skills include, but are not limited to, the abilities to develop and sustain partnerships with industry partners, recruit and retain uniquely qualified teachers, guide development of integrated curriculum, understand needs for and provide teacher professional development, guide development of comprehensive guidance systems that integrate college advising and career counseling, guide development of a coordinated and sequenced work-based learning component, and utilize data to assess pupil readiness for college and career.

(K) Recommendations for supporting regional coalitions in planning and developing programs.

(L) Evaluation of current linked learning programs, including partnership academies, regional occupational centers or programs and postsecondary linked learning programs, including middle colleges and early college models.

(M) Recommendations for increasing and improving in-school support services.

(N) Recommendations for incorporating new measures into the state’s accountability system to better assess the results of these linked learning programs.

(O) Assessment of the budgetary implications of offering all pupils access to these linked learning programs.

(d) For purposes of completing the report described in subdivision (b), the Superintendent is authorized to use existing state resources and federal funds. If state or federal funds are not available or sufficient, the Superintendent may apply for and accept grants and receive donations, and other financial support from public or private sources for purposes of this section.

(e) In developing the report, the Superintendent may accept support including, but not necessarily limited to, financial and technical support, from high school reform advocates, teachers, chamber organizations, industry representatives, research centers, parents, and pupils.

(f) The Superintendent shall report to the Legislature as to the status of completing the report and any preliminary recommendations no later than July 1, 2009.

(g) The Superintendent shall submit a final report with recommendations to the Legislature and the Governor no later than December 1, 2009.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 616, Sec. 2.   (AB 790)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

52373.

(a) The governing board of any high school district maintaining an agriculture course may transport pupils, instructors, or supervisors of classes to and from any classes or places where the work of the classes is being done, whether within or without the district, in the same manner and subject to the same limitations as in transporting pupils to and from school.

(b) No pupil shall be required to pay any fee or charge for transportation associated with activities of career technical student organizations which are a part of a career technical class or course of instruction offered for credit, when those activities are integral to assisting the pupil to achieve the career objectives of the class or course.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52374.

The duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the governing board of any high school district with respect to any high school established in the district prior to August 14, 1929, and not supported in whole or in part by any funds derived from the levy of any district tax may, with the approval of the State Board of Education, acting upon the recommendation of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, be transferred to the Chief of the Division of Vocational Education in the Department of Education who may appoint any qualified person to exercise immediate supervision over the school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52375.

No pupil shall be required to pay any fee or charge for enrollment or participation in activities of career technical student organizations which are a part of a career technical class or course of instruction offered for credit, when those activities are integral to assisting the pupil to achieve the career objectives of the class or course. This section shall apply to activities which occur during or outside of the regular schoolday.

This section does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law. Furthermore, this section shall not be construed to authorize a fee or charge for any pupil to enroll or participate in any activity other than career technical student organizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52376.

(a) The governing board of any school district that maintains a high school may expend supplemental funding apportioned pursuant to Section 54761 for the purposes of this section. Any governing board that expends supplemental grant funding pursuant to this section or accepts other funds made available for purposes of this section shall do all of the following:

(1) By May 1, 1991, establish procedures and policies required pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) By July 1, 1992, establish a program required pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) The governing board of each school district that elects to utilize supplemental grant funding or accept other funds for the purposes of this section shall do the following:

(1) Establish district policies and procedures to systematically review career technical education classes offered by the district to determine the degree to which each class may offer an alternative means for completing and receiving credit for specific portions of the district’s prescribed course of study to graduate from high school. The governing board shall ensure that those classes are equivalent, in terms of content and rigor, to the courses prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3.

(2) Establish district policies and procedures to compare, not less than every three years, the local curriculum, course content, and course sequence of career technical education programs in the district with the state model curriculum standards for career technical education.

(c) Each governing board expending supplemental grant funding or accepting other funds made available for the purposes of this section shall develop and implement, in consultation with the regional occupational center or program and community college serving the geographic area of the school district, a career technical education program that meets at least the following criteria:

(1) Provides a series of career technical education programs, each of which offers a sequence of courses leading to specific competencies that will enable pupils to manage personal and work life and attain entry level employment in business or industry upon graduation from high school. The plan to provide a series of career technical education programs shall be consistent with local agreements with regional occupational centers and programs and community colleges regarding the responsibilities for the provision and articulation of services among those local agencies. Each governing board shall also develop and implement plans for articulation of career technical courses, or both career technical and technical courses, with the community colleges to extend the sequence of courses through grades 13 and 14.

(2) Conducts or obtains access to needs data and assessment of local business and industry to ensure that the career technical education programs offered will prepare pupils in competencies for which employment opportunities exist.

(3) Provides counseling and guidance services to pupils to help them meet all necessary requirements for high school graduation and make informed career preparation choices. Counseling and guidance services provided to promote the purposes of this section may include counseling for pupils in grades 6 to 12, inclusive.

(4) Involves business and industry in cooperative projects with the schools to provide work experience opportunities, instructors from business and industry, assistance with needs assessments and program evaluations, and access to business and industry employment placement services.

(5) Provides access to employment placement services to help graduating pupils obtain employment.

(6) Includes a system of data collection to report annually to the governing board on the success or failure of each career technical education program in terms of all of the following:

(A) Pupils achieving the desired competencies.

(B) Pupils securing employment, particularly in jobs related to the area of their career technical preparation.

(C) Pupils proceeding to advanced education and training at the postsecondary level.

(D) Number and types of career technical classes offered and the number of those classes that qualify as alternative means to complete the prescribed course of study pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 51225.3.

(E) Number of pupils enrolled in career technical classes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52377.

Any reference to “vocational” education, skill training, instruction, or training in this code shall be deemed to be a reference to “career technical” education, skill training, instruction, or training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Summer Vocational Education [52381. - 52386.]

52381.

The Legislature finds that it is urgently necessary to reduce the continuing high level of unemployment among the youth and young adults by broadening and strengthening the existing career technical education programs to provide them with the necessary work skills in order that they will be equipped to participate in a meaningful manner in our ever increasingly technical society.

It is the intent of the Legislature by the provisions of this article to afford a means whereby school districts may broaden and strengthen the existing career technical education programs and to provide the districts with necessary financial support to enable them to implement career technical training and work programs during the summer months for the unemployed youth and young adults so that they may be trained in marketable work skills and earn funds as may be necessary to enable them to continue their education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52382.

A program of summer career technical and technical education may be established pursuant to this article by the governing board of any school district maintaining one or more high schools. Pupils who have completed grades 9 to 12, inclusive, may be permitted to participate in a program.

Summer career technical and technical education programs shall consist of training and instruction in any skills and crafts in which ample opportunities for gainful employment are to be found. The program may include work experience involving the gainful employment of pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 17.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52383.

Wages earned by pupils participating in a program of summer career technical and technical education, shall be paid weekly, or, if not reasonably possible, biweekly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52386.

The governing board of a school district may contract with and receive and expend funds from any other public or private agency, foundation, or corporation for the purposes of this article. The governing board of a
 school district may cooperate with public and private institutions of higher education in conducting programs pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 538, Sec. 34.   (SB 416)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Summer Environmental Internship Program [52410. - 52414.]

52410.

Upon the approval of appropriate school district personnel, or the approval of the county superintendent of schools as to students under his jurisdiction, and with the written approval of the parent or guardian of the student, a student in grade 11 or 12, who will be at least 17 years of age at the commencement of his junior year, may be employed as an environmental intern by a federal, state, or local agency in California concerned with the regulation of natural resources or with the protection of the environment during the summer vacation period. These agencies shall include, but not be limited to, the Resources Agency, the Agriculture and Services Agency, the Business and Transportation Agency, the Department of Fish and Game, the Department of Conservation, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Water Resources, the State Water Resources Control Board, the State Air Resources Board, the State Lands Division, California regional water quality control boards, air pollution control districts, mosquito abatement districts, soil conservation districts, local planning agencies, and county and city park and recreation departments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52411.

Duties of environmental interns employed pursuant to this article shall be established by the employing agency in conjunction with the local school district or the county superintendent of schools and shall be oriented toward providing maximum exposure to problems of environmental control and resource use.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52412.

Approval of environmental internships shall be required by the district superintendent or the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52413.

Successful completion of a summer program and submission by the environmental intern of a suitable project report to the school district may result in academic credit toward graduation from high school. Such students may be deemed to be temporarily employees of the agency involved for purposes of social security, unemployment insurance, and workers’ compensation or may be deemed for these purposes to be employees of the school district or the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52414.

The school district or county superintendent of schools and the employing agency shall jointly apply to the Conservation Education Service for funds. The Superintendent of Public Instruction, upon the recommendation of the Curriculum Development and Supplemental Materials Commission, and with the approval of the State Board of Education, is authorized to make grants for the purposes of this article, and for remuneration of interns and for travel and other job-related expenses, in an amount per person not to exceed three hundred twenty dollars ($320) per month.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Agricultural Career Technical Education [52450. - 52454.]

52450.

The Legislature of the State of California recognizes that agriculture is the most basic and singularly important industry in the state, that agriculture is of central importance to the welfare and economic stability of the state, and that the maintenance of this vital industry requires a continued source of trained and qualified individuals for employment in agriculture and agribusiness. The Legislature hereby declares that it is within the best interests of the people of the State of California that a comprehensive career technical education program in agriculture be created and maintained by the state’s school system in order to ensure an adequate supply of trained and skilled individuals and to ensure appropriate representation of racial and ethnic groups in all phases of the industry. For this purpose, the Legislature affirms that a state program for agricultural career technical education shall be established. It is the intent of the Legislature that a state program for agricultural education shall be a part of the curriculum of the state school system and made readily available to all school districts who may, at their option, include programs in career technical education in agriculture as a part of the curriculum of that district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52451.

The State Department of Education shall adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to implement the provisions of this article. The rules and regulations shall not create any new state mandates on school districts or county offices of education as a condition of receiving federal, state, and local funds by those entities.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, although this article does not create any new mandates, school districts and county offices of education are strongly advised to follow the guidelines set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 571, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

52452.

(a) There is hereby created within the department an agricultural career technical education unit to assist school districts in the establishment and maintenance of educational programs established pursuant to this article.
